District of Columbia statutes.
10-1202.24

Authority for vault space permit or airspace lease.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Mayor may issue a permit or airspace lease to Marriott International, Inc., or its designee, for vault space or airspace adjacent to the real property subject to the leases authorized by §§ 10-1202.22 and 10-1202.23, having a term not to exceed 99 years, or such longer period as may be otherwise determined by the Mayor, and at no additional rent or fee, except as may be otherwise determined by the Mayor, but otherwise in accordance with subchapters I and II of Chapter 11 of this title [§ 10-1101.01 et seq. and § 10-1121.01 et seq.], as applicable. The recording of any airspace lease executed pursuant to this section among the land records of the District of Columbia shall be exempt from the recordation tax imposed by § 42-1103.

Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-163, § 704
as added Apr. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-144, § 3(e), 55 DCR 2527
Mar. 21, 2009, D.C. Law 17-339, § 2(d), 56 DCR 947
Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-78, § 2(g), 56 DCR 6959
D.C. Law 17-339 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Mayor is authorized to issue a permit for vault space adjacent to the real property subject to the lease referenced in §§ 10-1202.22 and 10-1202.23 in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 11 of this title, coterminous with such lease and at no additional rent or fee.”
D.C. Law 18-78 inserted “The recording of any airspace lease executed pursuant to this section among the land records of the District of Columbia shall be exempt from the recordation tax imposed by § 42-1103.”

Section 2(c) of D.C. Law 17-228, at the end of the section heading, inserted “or airspace lease”; substituted “permit or lease” for “permit”; substituted “vault space or airspace” for “vault space”; and substituted “and the District of Columbia Public Space Utilization Act, approved October 17, 1968 (82 Stat. 1166; D.C. Official Code § 10-1121.01 et seq.), coterminous” for “coterminous”.

Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 17-228 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Section 2(b) of D.C. Law 17-294 amended this section to read as follows: “Sec. 704. Authority for vault space permit or airspace lease. ”Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Mayor may issue a permit or airspace lease to Marriott International, Inc., or its designee, for vault space or airspace adjacent to the real property subject to the leases referenced in sections 702 and 703, having a term not to exceed 99 years, or such longer period as may be otherwise determined by the Mayor, and at no additional rent or fee, except as may be otherwise determined by the Mayor, but otherwise in accordance with the District of Columbia Public Space Rental Act, approved October 17, 1968 (82 Stat. 1156; D.C. Official Code § 10-1101.01 et seq.), and the District of Columbia Public Space Utilization Act, approved October 17, 1968 (82 Stat. 1166; D.C. Official Code § 10-1121.01 et seq.), as applicable.”.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 17-294 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

For temporary (90 day) amendment, see § 2(c) of New Convention Center Hotel Technical Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-412, June 18, 2008, 55 DCR 7026).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of New Convention Center Hotel Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-556, October 27, 2008, 55 DCR 12004).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of New Convention Center Hotel Combined Technical Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-604, December 16, 2008, 56 DCR 17).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of New Convention Center Hotel Technical Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-28, March 16, 2009, 56 DCR 2319).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(g) of New Convention Center Hotel Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-186, August 12, 2009, 56 DCR 6967).